District of Columbia statutes.
7-1551.01

Authority of licensed blood banks to transfer blood components within District.

(a)

Any blood bank in the District of Columbia, holding an unsuspended and unrevoked license issued under § 262 of Title 42, United States Code, may transfer, for use in the District of Columbia, platelets and other components of blood in general use in the states (as determined by the Mayor of the District of Columbia), produced in such blood bank, to physicians licensed under Chapter 12 of Title 3, to District of Columbia hospitals, and to licensed private hospitals and other medical facilities in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Section 262 of Title 42, United States Code, shall not apply with respect to any transfer made in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

History

May 18, 1970, 84 Stat. 218, Pub. L. 91-256
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 9, 36 DCR 492

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1541.08.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 7-1541.08.
1981 Ed., § 2-1608.
1973 Ed., § 2-261.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.